Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB356.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1526 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1526. Youth Suicide Awareness and Prevention.--* * *(c.1) The following shall apply to school personnel and student suicide awareness and prevention training:(1) The department shall require a school entity serving students in grades six through twelve to provide students at least one (1) hour, or one (1) standard class period, of 1234567891011121314151617181920 evidence-based suicide awareness and prevention training each school year. The following shall apply:(i) The training may be delivered in person or digitally.(ii) The training shall begin within two (2) years of the development of the list required under paragraph (2).(iii) Training programs that combine the training requirements under this subsection and section 1526.1(a) may be used to fulfill the requirements of this subsection.(2) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall develop a list of evidence-based trainings and materials, including no-cost programming, if any, to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. At a minimum, the trainings shall:(i) Teach school personnel how to identify the signs and signals of depression, suicide and self-injury in students and when and how to refer youth and their families to appropriate mental health services for assessment within the school entity and the community.(ii) Teach students how to identify the signs and signals of depression, suicide and self-injury in themselves and their peers, the importance of seeking help for themselves and their peers and the process for seeking help.(3) The department shall make the list under paragraph (2) available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) For purposes of this subsection, the term "evidence-based" is defined as in section 1526.1(e).* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1526.1. Violence Prevention and Social Inclusion.--20250HB0356PN0310 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) The following shall apply to student safety and violence prevention training:(1) The department shall require a school entity serving students in grades six through twelve to provide students at least one (1) hour, or one (1) standard class period, of evidence-based youth violence prevention training each school year. The following shall apply:(i) The training may be delivered in person or digitally.(ii) The training shall begin within two (2) years of the development of the list required under paragraph (2).(iii) Training programs that combine the training requirements under this subsection and section 1526(c.1) may be used to fulfill the training requirements of this subsection.(2) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall develop a list of evidence-based trainings and materials, including no-cost programming, if any, to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. At a minimum, the trainings shall teach students the following:(i) How to identify observable warning signs and signals of an individual who may be a threat to the individual or others.(ii) The importance of taking threats seriously and seeking help.(iii) The steps that can be taken to report dangerous, violent, threatening, harmful or potentially harmful activity.(3) The department shall make the list under paragraph (2) available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) The following shall apply to student social inclusion training:(1) The department shall require a school entity serving 20250HB0356PN0310 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 students in kindergarten through grade twelve to provide students at least one (1) hour, or one (1) standard class period, of evidence-based social inclusion training each school year. The following shall apply:(i) The training may be delivered in person or digitally.(ii) The training shall begin within two (2) years of the development of the list required under paragraph (2).(2) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall develop a list of evidence-based trainings and materials, including no-cost programming, if any, to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. At a minimum, the trainings shall teach students the following:(i) What social isolation is and how to identify social isolation in others.(ii) The importance of taking social isolation seriously and seeking help for peers.(iii) How to utilize strategies to be more socially inclusive in the classroom and community and to establish connections with peers.(3) The department shall make the list under paragraph (2) available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) The following shall apply to student-led violence prevention clubs:(1) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall require a school entity serving students in kindergarten through grade twelve to designate a student-led violence prevention club that:(i) is open to all members of the student body of the school entity; and20250HB0356PN0310 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) has at least one (1) identified adult advisor of the club.(2) At a minimum, a student-led violence prevention club shall do the following:(i) Sustain awareness activities related to suicide prevention, violence prevention and social inclusion trainings.(ii) Foster opportunities for student leadership development.(d) To offset any costs associated with the implementation of the requirements of subsections (a), (b) and (c), the department shall, to the extent practicable, apply for any Federal or State funding made available to the department for the purposes of improving school safety.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Evidence-based." A program or practice that demonstrates any of the following:(1) A statistically significant effect on relevant outcomes based on any of the following:(i) Strong evidence from not fewer than one (1) well-designed and well-implemented experimental study.(ii) Moderate evidence from not fewer than one (1) well-designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study.(iii) Promising evidence from not fewer than one (1) well-designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical controls for selection bias.(2) A rationale based on high-quality research findings or 20250HB0356PN0310 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 positive evaluation that the program or practice is likely to improve relevant outcomes, which shall also include the ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the program or practice."School entity." A school district, joint school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0356PN0310 - 6 - 1234567